test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-nusj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - нусь: # Verb 'to stand' - partial paradigm
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: нудмʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: нун
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ну
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: нуниʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: нудиʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нуӈахаʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: нуваˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: нудаˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нуˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: нудамзь
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: нунась
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нусь
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: нунинзь
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: нудинзь
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нуӈаханзь
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: нуваць
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: нудаць
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нуць
     нусь+V+IV+Hort+ScSg1: нухудмʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Imprt+ScSg2: нуˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Opt+ScSg3: нуя
     нусь+V+IV+Hort+ScDu1: нухуниʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Imprt+ScDu2: нудиʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Opt+ScDu3: нуяхаʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Hort+ScPl1: нухуваˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Imprt+ScPl2: нудаˮ 
     нусь+V+IV+Opt+ScPl3: нуяˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: нуидмʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: нуин
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: нуи
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: нуиниʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: нуидиʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: нуихиʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: нуиваˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: нуидаˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: нуиˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: нуидамзь
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: нуинась
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: нуись
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: нуининзь
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: нуидинзь
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: нуихинзь
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: нуиваць
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: нуидаць
     нусь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: нуиць
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg1: нубцудмʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg2: нубцун
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg3: нубцу
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu1: нубцуниʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu2: нубцудиʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu3: нубцухуʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl1: нубцуваˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl2: нубцудаˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl3: нубцуˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg1: нусадмʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg2: нусан
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg3: нуса
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu1: нусаниʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu2: нусадиʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu3: нусахаʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl1: нусаваˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl2: нусадаˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl3: нусаˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: нувэдмʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: нувэн
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: нувы
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: нувэниʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: нувэдиʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: нувэхэʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: нувэваˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: нувэдаˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: нувыˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: нувэдамзь
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: нувэнась
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: нувысь
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: нувэнинзь
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: нувэдинзь
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: нувэхэнзь
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: нувэваць
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: нувэдаць
     нусь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: нувыць
     
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf: нува
     нусь+V+IV+InfPrf: нуˮма
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf: нуна
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf: нувы
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut: [нуванда, нувнда]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg: нувдавэй
     нусь+V+IV+Ger: нусь
     нусь+V+IV+GerFin: нуванзь
     нусь+V+IV+ConNeg: нуˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: нуӈгудмʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: нуӈгун
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нуӈгу
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: нуӈгуниʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: нуӈгудиʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нуӈгухуʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: нуӈгуваˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: нуӈгудаˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нуӈгуˮ 
